Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 14. Interstate Compact Relating to Juveniles.
16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia shall govern the covered interactions between the Commonwealth and those jurisdictions that have not ratified the Interstate Compact for Juveniles."

Acts 2007, cc. 277 and 387, cl. 4 provides: "That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2007, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, in substantially the form set out in

§

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia, by no less than 35 states as provided in

§

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice." This section, as rewritten, became effective August 26, 2008, when Illinois enacted the compact.

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendments by cc. 277 and 387 are nearly identical, and rewrote the Compact.